Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Irregular-Animate.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounIrregularAnimateStem;

LEXICON NounIrregularAnimate

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:ත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:ත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:යි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:යි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:ට #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:ටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:ටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:ගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:ගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:ගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ගෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ගෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ගෙයි #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC:නි #;

LEXICON NounIrregularAnimateStem   
බරනිඳු NounIrregularAnimate;
එකනෙකා	NounIrregularAnimate;
බලධරයකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
සිරකරැවන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
අධිකාරිතුමා	NounIrregularAnimate;
අයෝජකයින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
අහැලේපොල	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඇන්ටිපේටර්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඉයනෙස්කෝ	NounIrregularAnimate;
උපග්‍රහයින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
එස්පෙරාන්තො	NounIrregularAnimate;
කට්ටකරු	NounIrregularAnimate;
කරුණාමුණි	NounIrregularAnimate;
කාවින්ග	NounIrregularAnimate;
කී‍්‍රඩිකාවන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
කොක්ටන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ක්‍රිස්ටිනා	NounIrregularAnimate;
ගලගම	NounIrregularAnimate;
ගුරුභවතා	NounIrregularAnimate;
චන්දූප	NounIrregularAnimate;
චුයියා	NounIrregularAnimate;
ජාත්‍යන්තරවාදීන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ජොසෆට්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ටොල්ස්ටෝයි	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඩෙල්	NounIrregularAnimate;
තලෙයිසිංහම්	NounIrregularAnimate;
තෝල්ස්තෝයි	NounIrregularAnimate;
දුන්නේම	NounIrregularAnimate;
ධර්මදූතයින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
නසීම්	NounIrregularAnimate;
නිර්මාණශිල්පියා	NounIrregularAnimate;
නොයෙල්	NounIrregularAnimate;
පර්සියස්	NounIrregularAnimate;
පියරජතුමා	NounIrregularAnimate;
පූජකයකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
පොලිස්කාරයා	NounIrregularAnimate;
බංඩාර	NounIrregularAnimate;
බාහිය	NounIrregularAnimate;
බුලන	NounIrregularAnimate;
බ්‍රැඩොක්	NounIrregularAnimate;
මධුෂානී	NounIrregularAnimate;
මහරැජින	NounIrregularAnimate;
මාරියස්	NounIrregularAnimate;
මියුලර්	NounIrregularAnimate;
මෙන්දිස්	NounIrregularAnimate;
යසීන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
රදලයින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
රැඩොල්ෆ්	NounIrregularAnimate;
රොන්ට්ජන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ලිච්චවීවරුන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ලොකුගම	NounIrregularAnimate;
වරුසවිතාන	NounIrregularAnimate;
වික‍්‍රමසිංහ	NounIrregularAnimate;
විමාෂා	NounIrregularAnimate;
වෙලෙන්දන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ශාස්ත්‍රයම	NounIrregularAnimate;
ෂින්ගර්	NounIrregularAnimate;
සපුමල්	NounIrregularAnimate;
සහයරාජා	NounIrregularAnimate;
සිඤ්ඤෝ	NounIrregularAnimate;
සුරේෂනී	NounIrregularAnimate;
සෝනියන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ෆර්ගසන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ෆ්ලින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
හෆිස්	NounIrregularAnimate;
හෙන්රි‍	NounIrregularAnimate;
ආධාරකරුවන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
තුන්දෙනෙක්	NounIrregularAnimate;
කොමසාරිස්	NounIrregularAnimate;
කුකුළා	NounIrregularAnimate;
දුමින්ද	NounIrregularAnimate;
පොන්ටිං	NounIrregularAnimate;
රොනල්ඩෝ	NounIrregularAnimate;
සැපයුම්කරුවන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
වගාකරුවන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
හර්බජාන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
අටදෙනා	NounIrregularAnimate;
අසංග	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඉංග්‍රීසිකාරයා	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඔසාමා	NounIrregularAnimate;
කාව්‍යකරැවන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
කොහා	NounIrregularAnimate;
ගොනා	NounIrregularAnimate;
ජාකොබ්	NounIrregularAnimate;
තරස්වින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
දුවාදරුවන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
නිර්මාණකරුවකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
පලස්තීනුවන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
පේමෙ	NounIrregularAnimate;
බලදාරීන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
භුක්තිකරු	NounIrregularAnimate;
මැක්කා	NounIrregularAnimate;
මොහමඩ්	NounIrregularAnimate;
රාජපක්ෂයින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ලාරා	NounIrregularAnimate;
විදානෙලා	NounIrregularAnimate;
ශාලාධිපතිනිය	NounIrregularAnimate;
සෆීනා	NounIrregularAnimate;
සුද්ධෝදන	NounIrregularAnimate;
හන්වරුන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ලාංකිකයන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
නීතීඥයින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
අක්මීමන	NounIrregularAnimate;
චීවරධාරියා	NounIrregularAnimate;
මහලේකම්	NounIrregularAnimate;
හෂිනි	NounIrregularAnimate;
පර්යේෂකයන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ශාලාධිපති	NounIrregularAnimate;
ආදිපාදවරයා	NounIrregularAnimate;
අජිත	NounIrregularAnimate;
කුමුදු	NounIrregularAnimate;
දුල්මි	NounIrregularAnimate;
පූර්ණිමා	NounIrregularAnimate;
රංගම	NounIrregularAnimate;
වේදිකාවම	NounIrregularAnimate;
හාසන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ජෙයරාජ්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඔහු‍	NounIrregularAnimate;
නුසුදුස්සන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
මෝගන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ෆින්ච්	NounIrregularAnimate;
මන්ත්‍රීතුමා	NounIrregularAnimate;
දවල්	NounIrregularAnimate;
සෝමසිරි	NounIrregularAnimate;
තීබි	NounIrregularAnimate;
මනමේන්ද්‍ර	NounIrregularAnimate;
සපුරාදීම	NounIrregularAnimate;
අඩුබර	NounIrregularAnimate;
අනූසූරයන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
අම්බෙඞ්කාර්	NounIrregularAnimate;
අසනීපවීම	NounIrregularAnimate;
ආරක්‍ෂකයා	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඇලියස්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඉල්ලුම්කරුවකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
උඩුමලගල	NounIrregularAnimate;
එක්ස්පඩිෂන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
කක්ක	NounIrregularAnimate;
කරගනීම	NounIrregularAnimate;
කළැයි	NounIrregularAnimate;
කිඳෙල්පිටිය	NounIrregularAnimate;
කුරුඳුවාඩිය	NounIrregularAnimate;
කොපය	NounIrregularAnimate;
ක්රීඩකයින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ගළපාගන්න	NounIrregularAnimate;
ගිහින්තරුණයකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
ග්ලෝබල්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ජගතෙකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
ජීවිතාරක්‍ෂාව	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඩෑන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
තරගමාලාවල	NounIrregularAnimate;
තේසා	NounIrregularAnimate;
දැකගැන්ම	NounIrregularAnimate;
දීගලවත්ත	NounIrregularAnimate;
දොඩම්ගොඩ	NounIrregularAnimate;
නවකයෙකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
නැවැත්විම	NounIrregularAnimate;
නිලමේතුමන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
නොතියන්න	NounIrregularAnimate;
පරතෙර	NounIrregularAnimate;
පවත්වාගැනිම	NounIrregularAnimate;
පැංචා	NounIrregularAnimate;
පිරවිම	NounIrregularAnimate;
පුරාවම	NounIrregularAnimate;
පොත්පෙළ	NounIrregularAnimate;
ප්‍රථිවිය	NounIrregularAnimate;
බයකරන්න	NounIrregularAnimate;
බුදුවරයකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
බ්‍රහ්මත්වය	NounIrregularAnimate;
මඩුවන්වෙල	NounIrregularAnimate;
මහතාඅපි	NounIrregularAnimate;
මාහිංගල	NounIrregularAnimate;
මීගහවත්ත	NounIrregularAnimate;
මුස්ලිම්වරයෙකු	NounIrregularAnimate;
යටපත්වීම	NounIrregularAnimate;
රංගාවතරණය	NounIrregularAnimate;
රෂීන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
රිස්ලි	NounIrregularAnimate;
ලක්නොවීම	NounIrregularAnimate;
ලුවි	NounIrregularAnimate;
වනජීවීන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
වාකිරිගල	NounIrregularAnimate;
වැළකිම	NounIrregularAnimate;
වියළීයාම	NounIrregularAnimate;
වෙනිදින	NounIrregularAnimate;
ව්‍යාවසායකයන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
සංගීතවේදින්	NounIrregularAnimate;
සන්නද්ධවීම	NounIrregularAnimate;
සවිකිරිම	NounIrregularAnimate;
සැරකම	NounIrregularAnimate;
සීටස්	NounIrregularAnimate;
සෙන්ස්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ස්ටෝසර්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ෆ්ලැක්	NounIrregularAnimate;
හැකියාවන්වල	NounIrregularAnimate;
හෙක්ටර්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ක්‍රියාවලීන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
ෆැරඩේ	NounIrregularAnimate;
සමරවීර	NounIrregularAnimate;
ගෝවින්න	NounIrregularAnimate;
කොටා	NounIrregularAnimate;
පිරිනැමු	NounIrregularAnimate;
සිඳි	NounIrregularAnimate;
හෑගොඩ	NounIrregularAnimate;
ජාතීන්	NounIrregularAnimate;
අඩුව්ම	NounIrregularAnimate;
දුන්බව	NounIrregularAnimate;
මහණවීම	NounIrregularAnimate;
හීලියම්	NounIrregularAnimate;
බැසි	NounIrregularAnimate;
මධුක	NounIrregularAnimate;
කාශ්‍යප	NounIrregularAnimate;
කැප්පෙටිපොල	NounIrregularAnimate;
පැල්පිට	NounIrregularAnimate;
රුෂ්ඩි	NounIrregularAnimate;
ෆලීල්	NounIrregularAnimate;
විහාරගෙය	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඔවුන්ව	NounIrregularAnimate;
පත්කරන්නට	NounIrregularAnimate;
වෙද්දි	NounIrregularAnimate;
අතරේම	NounIrregularAnimate;
අනුවේදනීය	NounIrregularAnimate;
අයියනායක	NounIrregularAnimate;
අවුරුද්දෙදි	NounIrregularAnimate;
ආවර්ථයේ	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඈවර	NounIrregularAnimate;
ඉපදෙන්නෙ	NounIrregularAnimate;
එකක්යැ	NounIrregularAnimate;
එළවළුවක්ම	NounIrregularAnimate;
කණ්ඩායමක්ව	NounIrregularAnimate;
කලැ	NounIrregularAnimate;
කැටයම්කරණය	NounIrregularAnimate;
කුණුබක්කියට	NounIrregularAnimate;
කොහොමදැ	NounIrregularAnimate;
ගලස	NounIrregularAnimate;
ගෙනැ	NounIrregularAnimate;
චෙන්නායිහිදී	NounIrregularAnimate;
තිස්සමහාරාමෙට	NounIrregularAnimate;
දිස්ත්‍රිකවල	NounIrregularAnimate;
නඟන්නට	NounIrregularAnimate;
නිවුඩ්ඩ	NounIrregularAnimate;
පනස්දාහකට	NounIrregularAnimate;
පැවැත්වීමේදී	NounIrregularAnimate;
පොතෙන්ම	NounIrregularAnimate;
බලාගෙනම	NounIrregularAnimate;
මදැ	NounIrregularAnimate;
මුහුණපෑමට	NounIrregularAnimate;
රවුමේදී	NounIrregularAnimate;
ලේකම්වරයාව	NounIrregularAnimate;
වැදගත්වූ	NounIrregularAnimate;
වෙනතුරු	NounIrregularAnimate;
සන්නිවේදනයේදි	NounIrregularAnimate;
සිටිද්දීම	NounIrregularAnimate;
ෆෝර්	NounIrregularAnimate;
හුන්ඩා	NounIrregularAnimate;
අධිෂ්ඨානශීලී	NounIrregularAnimate;
පාක්ෂිකයො	NounIrregularAnimate;
හිමිකරගන්න	NounIrregularAnimate;
ලබාදීල	NounIrregularAnimate;
කව්රු	NounIrregularAnimate;
බිඳල	NounIrregularAnimate;
